Utah statutes.
63G-6a-710.   Multiple stage process.

(1)  The division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority may conduct a request for proposals in stages, where an earlier stage is used to qualify offerors for subsequent stages or to narrow the number of offerors that will move on to subsequent stages.

(2)  Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, the division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority shall conduct a multiple stage process in accordance with this part.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

